xapian-core/languages/algorithms/german.sbl
// Alias: de german2

routines (
           prelude postlude
           mark_regions
           R1 R2
           standard_suffix
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( p1 p2 x )

groupings ( v et_ending s_ending st_ending )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters */

stringdef a"   '{U+00E4}'
stringdef o"   '{U+00F6}'
stringdef u"   '{U+00FC}'
stringdef ss   '{U+00DF}'

define v 'aeiouy{a"}{o"}{u"}'

define et_ending 'dfgklmnrstUz{a"}'
define s_ending  'bdfghklmnrt'
define st_ending s_ending - 'r'

define prelude as (

    test repeat goto (
        v [('u'] v <- 'U') or
           ('y'] v <- 'Y')
    )

    repeat (
        [substring] among(
            '{ss}' (<- 'ss')
            'ae'   (<- '{a"}')
            'oe'   (<- '{o"}')
            'ue'   (<- '{u"}')
            'qu'   ()
            ''     (next)
        )
    )

)

define mark_regions as (

    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit

    test(hop 3 setmark x)

    gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p1
    try($p1 < x  $p1 = x)  // at least 3
    gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2

)

define postlude as repeat (

    [substring] among(
        'Y'    (<- 'y')
        'U'    (<- 'u')
        '{a"}' (<- 'a')
        '{o"}' (<- 'o')
        '{u"}' (<- 'u')
        ''     (next)
    )

)

backwardmode (

    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define standard_suffix as (
        do (
            [substring] R1 among(
                'em'
                (   not 'syst' // don't remove -em from words ending -system
                    delete
                )
                'ern' 'er'
                'erin' 'erinnen' // conflate female versions of nouns
                (   delete
                )
                'e' 'en' 'es'
                (   delete
                    try (['s'] 'nis' delete)
                )
                's'
                (   s_ending delete
                )
                'ln' 'lns'
                (   <- 'l'
                )
            )
        )
        do (
            [substring] R1 among(
                'en' 'er' 'est'
                (   delete
                )
                'st'
                (   st_ending hop 3 delete
                )
                'et'
                (   test et_ending
                    not among (
                        'geordn' // Still conflate untergeordnet/untergeordnetere, etc.
                        'intern' // Don't conflate Internet and internes.
                        'plan' // Don't conflate Plan and Planet.
                        'tick' // Don't conflate Tick and Ticket.
                        'tr'   // Still conflate Vertreter/Vertretung, etc.
                    )
                    delete
                )
            )
        )
        do (
            [substring] R2 among(
                'end' 'ung'
                (   delete
                    try (['ig'] not 'e' R2 delete)
                )
                'ig' 'ik' 'isch'
                (   not 'e' delete
                )
                'lich' 'heit'
                (   delete
                    try (
                        ['er' or 'en'] R1 delete
                    )
                )
                'keit'
                (   delete
                    try (
                        [substring] R2 among(
                            'lich' 'ig'
                            (   delete
                            )
                        )
                    )
                )
            )
        )
        do (
            [substring] among(
                '{'}s' '{'}sch' '{'}' (next  not atlimit  delete)
            )
        )
    )
)

define stem as (
    do prelude
    do mark_regions
    backwards
        do standard_suffix
    do postlude
)
